Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
VENUE

§603-36 Actions and proceedings, where to
be brought. Actions and proceedings of a civil nature within the
jurisdiction of the circuit courts shall be brought as follows:

(1) Actions described in section 603‑21.5(a)(2)
shall be brought in the circuit where it is alleged the penalty or forfeiture
was incurred;

(2) Actions in the nature of ejectment or trespass
quare clausum fregit or to quiet title to or partition real property shall be
brought in the circuit in which the real property in question is situated;
provided that if the real property, partition of which is sought, lies in more
than one circuit, the action may be brought in any circuit in which the real
property or any part thereof is situated;

(3) Proceedings concerning trusts and the estates of
decedents, missing persons, protected persons, minors, and incapacitated
persons shall be brought as prescribed by chapter 560;

(4) Applications for writs directed to courts of
inferior jurisdiction or for writs of quo warranto shall be made in the circuit
in which the alleged occasion for relief by any such writ arises; provided that
in case any such writ is necessary in the prosecution or furtherance of any
action or proceeding already begun or pending before any circuit court, the court
before which the action or proceeding has been begun or is pending may issue
the writ even though the alleged occasion for relief arose in another circuit;
and

(5) Actions other than those specified in paragraphs
(1) to (4) shall be brought in the circuit where the claim for relief arose or
where the defendant is domiciled; provided that if there is more than one
defendant, then the action shall be brought in the circuit in which the claim
for relief arose unless a majority of the defendants are domiciled in another
circuit, whereupon the action may be brought in the circuit where the majority
of the defendants are domiciled. [L 1892, c 57, §38; am L 1898, c 56, §1; am L
1903, c 32, §12; RL 1925, §2249; RL 1935, §3645; RL 1945, §9651; am L 1955, c
100, §1; RL 1955, §215-21; am L 1957, c 194, §1; HRS §603-36; am L 1972, c 88,
§3(o); am L 1976, c 200, pt of §1; am L 2016, c 55, §19]

Cross References

Venue:

Change of, see §603-37.

Insurance action, see §431:10-241.

Quiet title action, see §669-1.

Rules of Court

Hawaii Rules of Civil Procedure do not extend or limit
jurisdiction or venue, see HRCP rule 82.

Case Notes

Mortgage foreclosure. See 13 H. 193 (1900).

Statutory requirements as to residence cannot be waived in
divorce even by specific consent of the parties because the government is
interested in divorce proceedings. 19 H. 243 (1908). The foregoing case
distinguished between the bringing of a divorce case and the trying of such a
case and did not involve the power of the court to grant a change of venue.
See 19 H. 366, 373 (1909). See also 23 H. 376 (1916), et seq. in the matter of
statutory requirements as to time of residence.

Circuit court judges when sitting as commissioners of water
rights have jurisdiction only when the land involved is situated within their
respective circuits. 32 H. 404, 414 (1932).

Refusal to exercise jurisdiction though not limited by this
section. 32 H. 404 (1932).

No power to review rulings of another circuit judge. 33 H.
364 (1935).

Bringing of action in wrong circuit is ground for dismissal
but defect can be waived. 47 H. 271, 386 P.2d 880 (1963).

Paragraph (5) pertains to venue, not jurisdiction; venue
requirements may be waived. 53 H. 398, 495 P.2d 585 (1972).

Under rules of court and paragraph (5), addition of third
party defendants will not disturb venue based on main proceeding. 53 H. 398,
495 P.2d 585 (1972).

Cited: 29 H. 455, 457 (1926); 46 H. 197, 198, 377 P.2d 609
(1962).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next